Florida, session 2026, SB1266.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âSection 1004.0983, Florida Statutes, is created 26 to read: 27 1004.0983âCybersecurity Experiential Learning Program.â 28 (1)(a)âThe Legislature finds that this stateâs 29 cybersecurity workforce is essential to state and national 30 security, multi-sector state economic resilience, and the 31 protection of critical infrastructure. The Legislature also 32 finds that this state has a persistent shortfall in its supply 33 of qualified cybersecurity professionals relative to the 34 workforce demand, and that the growing integration of digital 35 technologies in all economic sectors will exacerbate this 36 workforce gap in the future. 37 (b)âThe Legislature further finds that there are examples 38 of successful cybersecurity experiential learning opportunities 39 across the state university system, including an experiential 40 cyber program at the University of South Florida, and a combined 41 security clearance readiness and cyber certification program at 42 the University of West Florida. Both institutions are designated 43 as National Security Agency National Centers of Academic 44 Excellence in Cybersecurity (NCAE-C). 45 (c)âThe Legislature further finds that expansion of 46 experiential learning opportunities in cybersecurity for 47 students at state universities and Florida College System 48 institutions is likely to accelerate the development of a highly 49 qualified cybersecurity workforce. This expanded capacity to 50 develop a more qualified cybersecurity workforce is necessary to 51 close existing gaps and keep pace with the growth in demand for 52 cybersecurity talent within this state. 53 (2)(a)âSubject to legislative appropriation, the Department 54 of Commerce shall create and operate the Cybersecurity 55 Experiential Learning Program in the 2026-2027 fiscal year. 56 (b)âThe Department of Commerce must use 10 percent of the 57 appropriated funds in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to enter into an 58 agreement with Cyber Florida within the University of South 59 Florida to collaborate in designing the program for 60 implementation at a minimum of one state university or Florida 61 College System institution during the 2026-2027 school year, and 62 to plan for the expansion of the program to additional sites and 63 additional national security-focused workforces in future years. 64 (3)âCyber Florida shall determine and report back to the 65 department on the following: 66 (a)âThe specific internship opportunities and experiential 67 learning opportunities that the United States Department of 68 Commerceâs National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) 69 believes will be the most impactful on a studentâs job placement 70 in high-demand cybersecurity roles in the state, including an 71 assessment of when completing a federal security clearance 72 readiness program will assist certain students in job placement 73 in this state. 74 (b)âA review of best practices for cybersecurity 75 experiential learning opportunities in place at other NCAE-C 76 designated institutions within and outside of this state which 77 can be replicated at institutions across this state. 78 (c)âA recommendation for the minimum qualifications a 79 student should possess or meet prior to enrolling in an 80 experiential learning program. 81 (d)âA listing of the state universities and Florida College 82 System institutions that wish to participate in the program, 83 along with an expected number of students to be served by the 84 program at each participating institution during the fiscal 85 year. Cyber Florida shall make a recommendation to the 86 department for the disbursement of available funds for the 87 program to maximize statewide impact, improve studentsâ job 88 placement, and support economic growth in this stateâs defense 89 industry. 90 (e)âA listing of employers in this state with openings or 91 anticipated openings in cybersecurity roles or other industries 92 that perform work that requires a security clearance. 93 (4)(a)âIn each fiscal year in which funds are appropriated 94 to the program, or where an unspent balance for the program 95 remains from a prior yearâs appropriation which can continue to 96 support the programâs operations, the Department of Commerce 97 may: 98 1.âImplement the program and directly disburse the funds to 99 participating institutions. Such funds may be used to cover the 100 cost of students going through the security clearance process; 101 or 102 2.âEnter into a mutually agreed upon multi-year contract 103 with Cyber Florida to administer the program statewide and 104 disburse the available funding to participating institutions. 105 (b)âAny disbursement of funds under this subsection is 106 subject to approval by the department. 107 (5)âBeginning January 15, 2028, and on each January 15 108 following the completion of a fiscal year in which the program 109 operates, the Department of Commerce shall submit a report to 110 the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 111 the House of Representatives which includes all the following: 112 (a)âThe number of students participating in experiential 113 learning opportunities at each participating institution and a 114 listing of the specific outcomes, skills, or credentials, 115 including security clearances, earned by students through the 116 program which contributed to job placement. 117 (b)âThe number of students who completed an experiential 118 learning opportunity through the program who subsequently 119 reported entering federal, state, or private sector 120 cybersecurity positions in the state, and the number of students 121 provided security clearance preparation training for other 122 fields. 123 (c)âRecommendations for program improvements, including 124 potential integration with other state workforce initiatives and 125 potentially expanding the program to workforces supporting 126 national security such as defense manufacturing and aerospace 127 related engineering fields. 128 (6)âThis section expires on July 1, 2032. 129 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.